Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-139
Court or department records provided; record required.

When any information is provided to the department or agency pursuant to section 43-138, the person providing the information shall record in the records of the adopted person the nature of the information disclosed, to whom the information was disclosed, and the date of the disclosure.

Laws 1980, LB 992, § 21;

Laws 1993, LB 205, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 36;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 84.